Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
In General
§ 53-3-19.
Procedure for seizure and sale of illegal gas and oil as contraband.

Apart from, and in addition to, any other remedy or procedure which may be available to the state oil and gas board, or any penalty which may be sought against or imposed upon any person with respect to violations relating to illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, all illegal oil, illegal gas and illegal product shall, except under such circumstances as are stated herein, be contraband and shall be seized and sold, and the proceeds applied as herein provided. Such sale shall not take place unless the court shall find, in the proceeding provided for in this paragraph, that the commodity involved is contraband. Whenever the board believes that illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product is subject to seizure and sale, as provided herein, it shall, through the attorney general, bring a civil action in rem for that purpose in the circuit court of the county where the commodity is found, or the action may be maintained in connection with any suit or cross-action for injunction or for penalty relating to any prohibited transaction involving such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product. Any interested person who may show himself to be adversely affected by any such seizure and sale shall have the right to intervene in such suit to protect his rights.

The action referred to above shall be strictly in rem and shall proceed in the name of the state as plaintiff against the illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product mentioned in the complaint, as defendant, and no bond or bonds shall be required of the plaintiff in connection therewith. Upon the filing of the complaint, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county, or to such officer or person as the court may authorize to serve process, requiring him to summon any and all persons (without undertaking to name them) who may be interested in the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product mentioned in the complaint to appear and answer within thirty days after the issuance and service of such summons. The summons shall contain the style and number of the suit and a very brief statement of the nature of the cause of action. It shall be served by posting one copy thereof at the courthouse door of the county where the commodity involved in the suit is alleged to be located and by posting another copy thereof near the place where the commodity is alleged to be located. Copy of such summons shall be posted at least five days before the return day stated therein, and the posting of such copy shall constitute constructive possession of such commodity by the state. A copy of the summons shall also be published once each week for three weeks in some newspaper published in the county where the suit is pending or having a bona fide circulation therein. No judgment shall be pronounced by any court condemning such commodity as contraband until after the lapse of five days from the last publication of said summons. Proof of service of said summons, and the manner thereof, shall be as provided by general law.

Where it appears by a verified pleading on the part of the plaintiff, or by affidavit, or affidavits, that grounds for the seizure and sale exist, the clerk, in addition to the summons, shall issue an order of seizure, which shall be signed by the clerk and bear the seal of the court. Such order of seizure shall specifically describe the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, so that the same may be identified with reasonable certainty. It shall direct the sheriff to whom it is addressed to take into his custody, actual or constructive, the illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, described therein, and to hold the same subject to the orders of the court. Said order of seizure shall be executed as a writ of attachment is executed. No bond shall be required before the issuance of such order of seizure, and the sheriff shall be responsible upon his official bond for the proper execution thereof. For his service hereunder, the sheriff shall receive a fee as in like cases of seizure of personal property and to be assessed as other cost in the cause.

Sales of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, seized under the authority of this section, and notice of such sales, shall be in accordance with the laws of this state relating to the sale of personal property under execution. For his services hereunder the sheriff shall receive a fee and expenses in like sales of personal property to be paid out of the proceeds of the sale or sales to be fixed by the court ordering such sale.

The court may order that the commodity be sold in specified lots or portions, and at specified intervals, instead of being sold at one time. Title to the amount sold shall pass as of the date of the act which is found by the court to make the commodity contraband. The judgment shall provide for payment of the proceeds of the sale into the state oil and gas fund, after first deducting the costs in connection with the proceedings and sale, and after paying to any royalty owner intervening as an interested party in the suit, the value of his interest in the said oil or gas, provided he has established his title to the said oil or gas royalty interest. The amount sold shall be treated as legal oil, legal gas or legal product, as the case may be, in the hands of the purchaser, but the purchaser and the commodity shall be subject to all applicable laws, and rules, regulations and orders with respect to further sale or purchase or acquisition, and with respect to the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, of the commodity purchased.

The producer, owner, or any other party contesting the validity of any such seizure and having an interest in securing the release of the seized oil, gas or other product, may obtain the release thereof upon furnishing a bond issued by a corporate surety company, duly qualified to do business in the state in an amount double the current market value of the oil, gas or other product held under seizure, which bond shall be conditioned and approved in the same manner as a replevin bond.

Nothing in this section shall deny or abridge any cause of action a royalty owner, or a lien holder, or any other claimant, may have, because of the forfeiture of the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, against the person whose act resulted in such forfeiture. All oil, gas or other illegal product sold as provided in this section shall be sold in like cases of personal property sold under execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-33; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 19.

§ 53-3-21.
Penalties for violations of Sections 53-3-3 through 53-3-19.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of Sections 53-3-3 through 53-3-19, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, shall be subject to the penalties and punishment set forth in Section 53-1-47.

HISTORY:
No history available for this section.

§ 53-3-23.
Flexible oil or gas drilling units.

Whenever a drilling unit for oil or gas is formed comprised entirely of lands within the State of Mississippi, with one or more unit boundaries being the center of the main navigable channel of the Mississippi River or any other navigable river constituting the boundary between the State of Mississippi and another state, such unit shall be a flexible unit. The size and shape of such unit shall change as the boundary line between the states changes.

Subsequent changes in the acreage content of such unit occasioned by the shifting of the state boundary line shall not occasion a reduction in the allowable acreage allocated to such unit.

This section shall cover and include oil and gas units which have been heretofore formed or which may be hereafter formed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-23.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 186, §§ 1-4.

§ 53-3-25.
Application for permit to drill in search of oil or gas.

Before any person shall commence the drilling of any well in search of oil or gas, the person shall file with the board his application for a permit to drill, accompanied by a certified plat and by a fee of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00), payable to the State Oil and Gas Board. When two (2) or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within the unit for which the permit is sought, the application shall affirmatively state whether there are separately owned tracts in the drilling unit for which the permit is sought, and if so, whether the person owning the drilling rights therein and the rights to share in the production therefrom have agreed to develop their lands as a drilling unit and to the drilling of the well, as contemplated by Section 53-3-7. If drilling operations have not commenced within one (1) year after date of issuance, the permit shall become void. If the application complies in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, a permit shall be issued promptly by the supervisor. The issuance of the permit shall constitute the establishment of the drilling unit as designated in the application and shall likewise constitute the approval of the well location set out in the permit. On good cause shown, the unit may be altered by the board after notice and hearing.

If the application for permit does not comply in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, the application shall be disallowed and the supervisor shall promptly notify the applicant of the reason or reasons for the disallowance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 32(1); Laws, 2007, ch. 363, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 53-3-27.
Application to commence drilling of stratigraphic test or well below freshwater level; duration of permit.

Before any person shall commence the drilling of a stratigraphic test or any well below the freshwater level (other than an oil or gas well or injection well), such person shall file with the board his application for a permit to drill, accompanied by a fee of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00), or some lesser sum as may be fixed by order of the board, payable to the State Oil and Gas Board. If the application complies in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, a permit shall be issued promptly by the supervisor. Any such permit, when issued and the fee paid thereon, shall be good for a period of one (1) year from the date thereof; and in the event drilling has commenced within one (1) year, the permit shall be good for the life of the well commenced, unless during the course of drilling or production the operator is changed.

If the application for a permit does not comply in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, said application shall be disallowed, and the supervisor shall promptly notify the applicant of the reason or reasons for the disallowance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 32(2); Laws, 1989, ch. 444, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 53-3-29.
Application to commence drilling injection well; duration of permit.

Before any person shall commence the drilling of an injection well, such person shall file with the board his application for a permit to drill, accompanied by a fee of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00), or some lesser sum as may be fixed by order of the board, payable to the State Oil and Gas Board. If the application complies in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, a permit shall be issued by the supervisor upon approval by the State Oil and Gas Board, after notice and hearing. Any such permit, when issued and the fee paid thereon, shall be good for a period of one (1) year from the date thereof; and in the event drilling has commenced within one (1) year, the permit shall be good for the life of the well commenced, unless during the course of drilling or production the operator is changed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 32(3); Laws, 1989, ch. 444, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 53-3-31.
Application to rework abandoned well to injection well; duration of permit.

Before any person shall commence operations to rework an abandoned well to an injection well, such person shall file with the board his application to rework, accompanied by a fee of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00), or some lesser sum as may be fixed by order of the board, payable to the State Oil and Gas Board. If the application complies in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, a permit shall be issued by the supervisor upon approval by the State Oil and Gas Board, after notice and hearing. Any such permit, when issued and the fee paid thereon, shall be good for a period of one (1) year from the date thereof; and in the event drilling has commenced within one (1) year, the permit shall be good for the life of the well commenced, unless during the course of drilling or production the operator is changed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 32(4); Laws, 1989, ch. 444, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 443, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 53-3-33.
Application to rework operating well or injection well.

Before any person shall commence operations to rework an operating well or injection well to recomplete to another zone, formation or reservoir, such person shall file with the board his application to rework, accompanied by a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or some lesser sum as may be fixed by order of the board, payable to the State Oil and Gas Board. If the application complies in all respects with the rules and regulations of the board relating thereto, a permit shall be issued by the supervisor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 32(5); Laws, 1984; ch 376 1989, ch. 444, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 53-3-35.
Reports by producer or operator of oil or gas well; monthly individual well status report; producer’s monthly report; deliverability test; calibrated stock tank.

Each producer or operator of an oil or gas well shall furnish for each month a “monthly individual well status report,” setting forth complete information and data indicated thereon. Such report for each month shall be prepared and filed according to the instructions on a form published by the board for such reports, on or before the first day of the second month following the month during which the production was made.

Each operator or producer of oil or gas shall furnish for each month a “producer’s monthly report,” setting forth complete information and data indicated thereon. Such report for each month shall be prepared and filed with the board on a form published by the board for such reports, according to the instructions on said form, on or before the first day of the second month following the month during which the production was made.

A deliverability test of each producing gas well shall be made in conformity with schedules issued by the board. Such test shall be an actual test to determine whether or not the well is capable of producing efficiently any allowable that may reasonably be expected to be assigned to it, and, if the well is not found to be capable, then the test shall determine the maximum rate at which the well may efficiently be produced. The method of testing used shall be one acceptable to the board. A report of each test so required shall be promptly furnished to the board on a form published by the board for such reports. Any operator may make such additional deliverability tests at any time and report such tests to the board in the same manner as required tests are reported. Deliverability shall be determined by the latest test information furnished to the board.

Each oil well and each oil completion of a multiply-completed well shall be tested by the operator once during each calendar month during each calendar year in a calibrated stock tank. The result of such tests shall be reported in writing within thirty (30) days after the end of each month to the state oil and gas board on a form published by the board for such test results.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 33(1-3), eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 53-3-37.
Penalties for violations concerning reports.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of Section 53-3-35 regarding the filing of reports by failing to file such reports on a timely basis, or by the willful, knowing or fraudulent execution of a report which contains a false entry or statement of fact, or an omission of fact, shall be subject to a penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. Provided, however, the same procedure for notice and hearing as that found in subsection (b) of Section 53-1-47 shall be followed in cases of violations of Section 53-3-35.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 33(4); Laws, 1989, ch. 444, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 53-3-39.
Payment of interest on royalty proceeds which have not been disbursed.

Purchasers of oil or gas production from any oil or gas well shall be liable for the payment of interest on royalty proceeds which have not been disbursed to the royalty owners from and after one hundred twenty (120) days following the date of the first sale of oil or gas.

The rate of interest shall be eight percent (8%) per annum and shall be computed from the date of one hundred twenty (120) days after such first sale; however, from and after July 1, 1992, the rate of interest shall be the greater of eight percent (8%) per annum or two percent (2%) above the federal discount rate in effect as of the second day of January of each year during which interest on such royalty proceeds is payable, except in those instances where the royalty proceeds cannot be paid because the title thereto is not marketable, in which case the rate of interest on a per annum basis shall be equal to the federal reserve discount rate in effect as of the second day of January of each year during which interest on the royalty proceeds is payable. The accrued interest shall be paid to the royalty owners at the time of the payment of the accrued royalty proceeds, such rate of interest to be displayed on the disbursement document. As used herein, “first sale” shall mean the first commercial sale of production after completion of the well and shall not include sales of oil or gas during initial testing prior to completion of the well.

Whenever the disbursal of royalty proceeds is suspended for any reason whatsoever, the purchasers of production shall be liable for the payment of interest on the royalty proceeds which have been suspended. Except as otherwise provided, the rate of interest shall be eight percent (8%) per annum and shall be computed from the date that the royalty payments were halted or suspended; provided, however, that if such date is less than one hundred twenty (120) days after the first sale of oil or gas, then such interest shall be computed from the date of one hundred twenty (120) days after such first sale. From and after July 1, 1992, the rate of interest shall be the greater of eight percent (8%) per annum or two percent (2%) above the federal discount rate in effect as of the second day of January of each year during which interest on such royalty proceeds is payable, except in those instances where the royalty proceeds are suspended because the title thereto is not marketable, in which case the rate of interest on a per annum basis shall be equal to the federal reserve discount rate in effect as of the second day of January of each year during which interest on such proceeds is payable. The accrued interest shall be paid to the royalty owners at the time of the payment of the suspended royalty proceeds, such rate of interest to be displayed on the disbursement document.

The purchaser of production from a well shall be exempt from the provisions of this section and the operator and/or the owner of the right to drill and to produce under an oil and/or gas lease shall be substituted for the purchaser herein where the operator and/or the owner and purchaser have entered into an arrangement where the royalty proceeds are paid by the purchaser to the operator and/or the owner who assumes responsibility of paying the proceeds to the royalty owners legally entitled thereto. Where the operator and/or the owner of the drilling rights are substituted herein for the purchaser, the interest provided for hereinabove shall accrue from the date set forth hereinabove or from the date of such operator and/or owner’s receipt of the proceeds of such production, whichever is the later date.

Provided further, that as to royalty payments regularly disbursed in the normal course of business, nothing in this section shall be construed to require the payment of interest on royalty payments disbursed to the royalty owners no later than sixty (60) days after the end of the calendar month within which such royalty production was sold. Provided further, that whenever the aggregate of one hundred twenty (120) days’ accumulation of monthly proceeds payable to any royalty owner does not exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), no interest shall accrue or be payable thereon, provided that the disbursement of such accumulated proceeds be made to the royalty owner no later than once each one-hundred-twenty-day period.

For the purposes of this section, marketability of title shall be determined in accordance with real property law governing title to oil and gas interests as recognized at the time the royalty payments were suspended or not paid.

The provisions of this section which require payment of interest on royalty proceeds which have not been disbursed may not be waived or reduced by a royalty owner entitled to such interest payment unless said royalty owner shall attest to a statement which shall be typed in bold print on a separate form and attached to the relevant division order contract as to the royalty owner’s interest. Such statement shall be set out as follows:

I, (royalty owner’s name) hereby agree to waive the statutory right given me to receive interest on royalty proceeds as provided by Section 53-3-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, from (purchaser or operator and/or owner of right to drill), which is due me as evidenced from the attached division order contract. This is the day of , 20. (royalty owner’s signature)

Click to view

The words “owner,” “oil,” “gas” and “royalty owner” used in this section shall have the meanings attributed to them in Section 53-1-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 373; Laws, 1992, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 53-3-41.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein:

“Oil and gas production” means any oil, natural gas, condensate of either, natural gas liquids, other gaseous, liquid or dissolved hydrocarbons, sulfur or helium, or other substance produced as a by-product or adjunct to their production, or any combination of these, which is severed, extracted or produced from the ground, the seabed or other submerged lands within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi. Any such substance, including recoverable or recovered natural gas liquids, which is transported to or in a natural gas pipeline or natural gas gathering system, or otherwise transported or sold for use as natural gas, or is transported or sold for the extraction of helium or natural gas liquids is gas production. Any such substance which is transported or sold to persons and for purposes not included in the foregoing natural gas definition is oil production.

“Interest owner” means a person owning an entire or fractional interest of any kind or nature in oil or gas production at the time of severance, or a person who has an express, implied or constructive right to receive a monetary payment determined by the value of oil or gas production or by the amount of production.

“Royalty owner” means any person who possesses an interest in the production, but who is not an owner as defined in Section 53-1-3(g).

“Disbursing agent” shall mean that person who, pursuant to an oil and gas lease, operating agreement, purchase contract, or otherwise, assumes the responsibility of paying royalty proceeds derived from a well’s oil and gas production to the royalty owner or owners legally entitled thereto. A first purchaser shall not be deemed to be the disbursing agent unless the first purchaser expressly assumes such responsibility in the purchase contract.

“First purchaser” means the first person who purchases oil or gas production from the interest owners after the production is severed and may include the operator if the operator acts as a purchaser of production attributable to other interest owners.

An “operator” is a person engaged in the business of severing oil or gas production from the ground, whether for himself alone, for other persons alone or for himself and others.

Whenever a disbursing agent has not disbursed the royalty proceeds derived from the well’s production to the royalty owner within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date of first sale of oil or gas in the event the disbursing agent is a first purchaser of oil or gas, or within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date the disbursing agent receives the proceeds from such production if the disbursing agent is not the first purchaser, such royalty owner shall have a lien to secure the payment of the royalty proceeds. The lien shall attach to the proceeds from such production received by the disbursing agent attributable to the royalty owner’s interest.

The lien provided by this section shall be effective against a third party only from the time a financing statement evidencing such lien is filed in the same manner as financing statements evidencing security interests in minerals are filed in accordance with the provisions of Section 75-9-501.

The lien provided by this section shall expire one (1) year after it becomes effective against a third party, unless judicial proceedings have been commenced to assert it or unless insolvency proceedings have been commenced by or against the disbursing agent, in which event the lien shall remain effective until termination of the insolvency proceedings or until expiration of the one-year period, whichever occurs later.

Whenever there is a conflict between a lien under this section and a security interest under Title 75, Chapter 9, the lien or security interest first to be filed has priority. Liens provided for in this section shall have priorities among themselves according to priority in time of filing of such liens.

The filing required by this section shall be a financing statement as provided for in Section 75-9-310 and shall be subject to the provisions of Part 5 of Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, except that in order for the filing to be sufficient, it shall not be necessary for the debtor to sign the financing statement, and the filing shall be effective for a period of only one (1) year from the date of filing.

This section does not impair an operator’s right to set off or withhold funds from other interest owners as security for or in satisfaction of any debt or security interest. This section does not impair a disbursing agent’s right to withhold funds in the event a question is raised concerning the title or ownership of, or right to sell, the oil or gas production. In case of a dispute between interest owners, a good-faith tender by the disbursing agent of funds to the person the interest owners shall agree on, or to a court of competent jurisdiction in the event of litigation or bankruptcy, shall operate as a tender of the funds to both.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to enlarge or diminish the rights and obligations provided to or imposed on interest owners, royalty owners, disbursing agents, first purchasers, or operators by contract or otherwise by law. The sole purpose of this section is to provide royalty owners a lien under the conditions provided herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 466; Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 29, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2002.